Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-207
Appointment as fiduciary, authorized; oath.

Courts of this state may appoint a trust company receiver, assignee, trustee, guardian, conservator, personal representative, custodian, or special administrator. When a trust company is so appointed and an oath is required to be made, whether in order to qualify or for any other purpose, the president, vice president, secretary, or trust officer may, on behalf of the trust company, make and subscribe the required oath.

Laws 1911, c. 31, § 7, p. 191;

R.S.1913, § 744;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVIII, § 7, p. 720;

C.S.1922, § 8069;

C.S.1929, § 8-207;

R.S.1943, § 8-207;

Laws 1947, c. 13, § 4, p. 78;

Laws 1986, LB 909, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 21;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 132.